New York, session 2025-2026, A9040.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the town of Babylon is hereby authorized to accept from 3 Worship Center International Inc., a religious not-for-profit corpo- 4 ration, an application for exemption from real property taxes pursuant 5 to section 420-a of the real property tax law with respect to the 2020- 6 2021, 2021-2022, and 2022-2023 assessment rolls for the general taxes, 7 and the 2020-2021, 2021-2022, and 2022-2023 school taxes for the parcels 8 conveyed to such organization, with such parcels being located in the 9 town of Babylon, county of Suffolk, at 111 Warren Street otherwise known 10 as Suffolk county tax map section 100, block 2, lot 28.001. If 11 accepted, the application shall be reviewed as if it had been received 12 on or before the taxable status dates established for such rolls. 13 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to 14 such exemption if such organization had acquired the subject property 15 and filed an application for exemption by the appropriate taxable status 16 dates, the assessor, upon approval of the town board of the town of 17 Babylon, may grant exemption from all taxation and make appropriate 18 corrections to the subject rolls. If such exemption is granted and such 19 organization, therefor, shall have paid any tax with respect to the 20 subject rolls, the applicable governing body or tax department may, in 21 its sole discretion, provide for the refund of those taxes paid and 22 cancel those taxes, fines, penalties, liens, interest or tax liens 23 remaining unpaid. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13391-01-5